California statutes. Corporations Code
(c) A person winding up a partnership’s business may preserve the partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, settle and close the partnership’s business, dispose of and transfer the partnership’s property, discharge the partnership’s liabilities, distribute the assets of the partnership pursuant to Section 16807, settle disputes by mediation or arbitration, and perform other necessary acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16804.

Subject to Section 16805, a partnership is bound by a partner’s act after dissolution that is either of the following:

(1) Appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

(2) Would have bound the partnership under Section 16301 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16805.

(a) After dissolution, a partner who has not wrongfully dissociated may file a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership as filed with the Secretary of State, any identification number issued by the Secretary of State, and that the partnership has dissolved and is winding up its business.

(b) A statement of dissolution cancels a filed statement of partnership authority for the purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 16303 and is a limitation on authority for the purposes of subdivision (e) of Section 16303.

(c) For the purposes of Sections 16301 and 16804, a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissolution and the limitation on the partners’ authority as a result of the statement of dissolution 90 days after it is filed.

(d) After filing and, if appropriate, recording a statement of dissolution, a dissolved partnership may file and, if appropriate, record a statement of partnership authority that will operate with respect to a person not a partner as provided in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 16303 in any transaction, whether or not the transaction is appropriate for winding up the partnership business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16806.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) and except for registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships, after dissolution a partner is liable to the other partners for the partner’s share of any partnership liability incurred under Section 16804.

(b) Except for registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships, a partner who, with knowledge of the dissolution, incurs a partnership liability under paragraph (2) of Section 16804 by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business is liable to the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the liability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16807.

(a) In winding up a partnership’s business, the assets of the partnership, including the contributions of the partners required by this section, shall be applied to discharge its obligations to creditors, including, to the extent permitted by law, partners who are creditors. Any surplus shall be applied to pay in cash the net amount distributable to partners in accordance with their right to distributions under subdivision (b).

(b) Each partner is entitled to a settlement of all partnership accounts upon winding up the partnership business. In settling accounts among the partners, the profits and losses that result from the liquidation of the partnership assets shall be credited and charged to the partners’ accounts. The partnership shall make a distribution to a partner in an amount equal to any excess of the credits over the charges in the partner’s account. Except for registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships, a partner shall contribute to the partnership an amount equal to any excess of the charges over the credits in the partner’s account.

(c) If a partner fails to contribute the full amount that the partner is obligated to contribute under subdivision (b), all of the other partners shall contribute, in the proportions in which those partners share partnership losses, the additional amount necessary to satisfy the partnership obligations for which they are liable under Section 16306. A partner or partner’s legal representative may recover from the other partners any contributions the partner makes to the extent the amount contributed exceeds that partner’s share of the partnership obligations for which the partner is personally liable under Section 16306.

(d) After the settlement of accounts, each partner shall contribute, in the proportion in which the partner shares partnership losses, the amount necessary to satisfy partnership obligations that were not known at the time of the settlement and for which the partner is personally liable under Section 16306.

(e) The estate of a deceased partner is liable for the partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership.

(f) An assignee for the benefit of creditors of a partnership or a partner, or a person appointed by a court to represent creditors of a partnership or a partner, may enforce a partner’s obligation to contribute to the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Conversions and Mergers [16901. - 16917.]

16901.

In this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Constituent other business entity” means any other business entity that is merged with or into one or more partnerships and includes a surviving other business entity.

(2) “Constituent partnership” means a partnership that is merged with or into one or more other partnerships or other business entities and includes a surviving partnership.

(3) “Disappearing other business entity” means a constituent other business entity that is not the surviving other business entity.

(4) “Disappearing
 partnership” means a constituent partnership that is not the surviving partnership.

(5) “Domestic” means organized under the laws of this state when used in relation to any partnership, other business entity, or person (other than an individual).

(6) “Foreign other business entity” means any other business entity formed under the laws of any state other than this state or under the laws of the United States or of a foreign country.

(7) “Foreign partnership” means a partnership formed under the laws of any state other than this state or under the laws of a foreign country.

(8) “General partner” means a partner in a partnership and a general partner in a limited partnership.

(9) “Limited
 liability company” means a limited liability company created under Title 2.6 (commencing with Section 17701.01), or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

(10) “Limited partner” means a limited partner in a limited partnership.

(11) “Limited partnership” means a limited partnership created under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 15611) or Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 15900), predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

(12) “Other business entity” means a limited partnership, limited liability company, corporation, business trust, real estate investment trust,
 or an unincorporated association (other than a nonprofit association), but excluding a partnership.

(13) “Partner” includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

(14) “Surviving other business entity” means an other business entity into which one or more partnerships are merged.

(15) “Surviving partnership” means a partnership into which one or more other partnerships or other business entities are merged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 64, Sec. 6.   (AB 2742)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16902.

(a) A partnership, other than a registered limited liability partnership, may be converted into a domestic other business entity or a foreign other business entity pursuant to this article if, (1) pursuant to a conversion into a domestic or foreign limited partnership or limited liability company, each of the partners of the converting partnership would receive a percentage interest in the profits and capital of the converted other business entity equal to the partner’s percentage interest in profits and capital of the converting partnership as of the effective time of the conversion, and (2) pursuant to a conversion into an other business entity or foreign other business entity not specified in clause (1) above, each of the partnership interests of the same class is treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, property, rights, interests, or securities of the converted other business entity unless all partners of the same class consent.

(b) Notwithstanding this section, the conversion of a partnership to a domestic or foreign other business entity may be effected only if: (1) the law under which that domestic or foreign other business entity will exist expressly permits the formation of that other entity pursuant to a conversion; and (2) the partnership complies with any and all other requirements of that other law that applies to conversion of the other business entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16903.

(a) A partnership that desires to convert to a domestic or foreign other business entity shall approve a plan of conversion. The plan of conversion shall state the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the conversion.

(2) The place of the organization of the converted entity and of the converting partnership and the name of the converted entity after conversion, if different from that of the converting partnership.

(3) The manner of converting the partnership interests of each of the partners into shares of, securities of, or
 interests in the converted entity.

(4) The provisions of the governing documents for the converted entity, including the limited partnership agreement, limited liability company articles of organization and operating agreement, or articles or certificate of incorporation if the converted entity is a corporation, to which the holders of interest in the converted entity are to be bound.

(5) Any other details or provisions as are required by laws under which the converted entity is organized.

(6) Any other details or provisions that are desired.

(b) The plan of conversion shall be approved by that number or percentage of partners required by the partnership
 agreement to approve a conversion of the partnership as set forth in the partnership agreement. If the partnership agreement fails to specify the required partner approval for a conversion of the partnership, the plan of conversion shall be approved by that number or percentage of partners required by the partnership agreement to approve an amendment to the partnership agreement unless the conversion effects a change for which the partnership agreement requires a greater number or percentage of partners than that required to amend the partnership agreement, in which case the plan of conversion shall be approved by that greater number or percentage. If the partnership agreement fails to specify the vote required to amend the partnership agreement, the plan of conversion shall be approved by all partners.

(c) If the partnership is
 converting into a limited partnership, in addition to the approval of the partners as set forth in subdivision (b), the plan of conversion shall be approved by all partners who will become general partners of the converted limited partnership pursuant to the plan of conversion.

(d) All partners of the converting partnership except those that dissociate upon effectiveness of the conversion pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 16909 shall be deemed parties to any partnership or operating agreement, articles or certificate of incorporation, or organic document for the converted entity adopted as part of the plan of conversion, regardless of whether that partner has executed the plan of conversion or the operating agreement, articles or certificate of incorporation, partnership agreement, or other organic document for the converted entity. Any
 adoption of a new partnership or operating agreement, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other organic document made pursuant to the foregoing sentence shall be effective at the effective time or date of the conversion.

(e) Notwithstanding its prior approval, a plan of conversion may be amended before the conversion takes effect if the amendment is approved by the partnership in the same manner, and by the same number or percentage of partners, as was required for approval of the original plan of conversion.

(f) The partners of a converting partnership may, at any time before the conversion is effective, in their discretion, abandon a conversion, without further approval by the partners, in the same manner, and by the same number or percentage of partners, as was required
 for approval of the original plan of conversion at any time before the conversion is effective, subject to the contractual rights of third parties.

(g) The converted entity shall keep the plan of conversion at: (1) the principal place of business of the converted entity, if the converted entity is a foreign other business entity or a corporation; or (2) the office at which records are to be kept under Section 15614 or 15901.14 if the converted entity is a domestic limited partnership, or at the office at which records are to be kept under Section 17701.13 if the converted entity is a domestic limited liability company. Upon the request of a partner of a converting partnership, the authorized person on behalf of the converted entity shall promptly deliver to the partner or the holder of interests or other securities, at the expense of the
 converted entity, a copy of the plan of conversion. A waiver by a partner of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 16.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

16904.

(a) A conversion into a domestic other business entity shall become effective upon the earliest date that all of the following shall have occurred:

(1) The approval of the plan of conversion by the partners of the converting partnership as provided in Section 16903.

(2) The filing of all documents required by law to create the converted other business entity, which documents shall also contain a statement of conversion, if required under Section 16906.

(3) The effective date, if set forth in the plan of conversion, shall have occurred.

(b) A copy of the certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, or articles of incorporation, complying with Section 16906, if applicable, duly certified by the Secretary of State, is conclusive evidence of the conversion of the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16905.

(a) The conversion of a partnership into a foreign other business entity shall comply with Section 16902.

(b) If the partnership is converting into a foreign other business entity, then the conversion proceedings shall be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of organization of the foreign other business entity and the conversion shall become effective in accordance with that law.

(c) (1) Unless a statement of conversion has been filed to effect the conversion, the converted foreign other business entity shall promptly notify the Secretary of State of the mailing
 address of its agent for service of process, its principal office, and of any change of address. To enforce an obligation of a partnership that has converted to a foreign other business entity, the Secretary of State shall only be the agent for service of process in an action or proceeding against the converted foreign other business entity, if the agent designated for the service of process for that entity is a natural person and cannot be found with due diligence or if the agent is a corporation and no person, to whom delivery may be made, may be located with due diligence, or if no agent has been designated and if no one of the officers, partners, managers, members, or agents of that entity may be located after diligent search, and it is so shown by affidavit to the satisfaction of the court. The court then may make an order that service be made by personal delivery to the Secretary of State or
 to an assistant or deputy Secretary of State of two copies of the process together with two copies of the order, and the order shall set forth an address to which the process shall be sent by the Secretary of State. Service in this manner is deemed complete on the 10th day after delivery of the process to the Secretary of State.

(2) Upon receipt of the process and order and the fee set forth in Section 12197 of the Government Code, the Secretary of State shall provide notice to the entity of the service of the process by forwarding by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the process and order to the address specified in the order.

(3) The Secretary of State shall keep a record of all process served upon the Secretary of State and shall record therein the time
 of service and the Secretary of State’s action with respect thereto. The certificate of the Secretary of State, under the Secretary of State’s official seal, certifying to the receipt of process, the providing of notice thereof to the entity, and the forwarding of the process, shall be competent and prima facie evidence of the matters stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 106.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16906.

(a) If the converting partnership has filed a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303 that is effective at the time of the conversion, then upon conversion to a domestic limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, or articles of incorporation filed by the converted entity, as applicable, shall contain a statement of conversion, in that form as may be prescribed by the Secretary of State. If the converting partnership has not filed a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303 that is effective at the time of the conversion, upon conversion to a domestic limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, the converted
 entity may, but is not required to file, on its certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, or articles of incorporation, a statement of conversion. A statement of conversion shall set forth all of the following:

(1) The name of the converting partnership and the Secretary of State’s file number, if any, of the converting partnership.

(2) A statement that the principal terms of the plan of conversion were approved by a vote of the partners, which equaled or exceeded the vote required under Section 16903.

(3) The name, mailing address, and street address of the converted entity’s agent for service of process. If a corporation qualified under Section 1505 is designated as the agent, no address for it shall
 be set forth.

(b) A partnership converting to a foreign other business entity that has filed a statement of partnership authority under Section 16303 that is effective at the time of conversion may file a certificate of conversion with the Secretary of State. The certificate of conversion shall contain the following:

(1) The names of the converting partnership and the converted entity.

(2) The street address of the converted entity’s principal office and of a principal office in California, if any.

(3) The form of organization of the converted entity.

(4) The name, mailing address, and street address
 of the converted entity’s agent for service of process. If a corporation qualified under Section 1505 is designated as the agent, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) The filing with the Secretary of State of a certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, or articles of incorporation containing a statement of conversion as set forth in subdivision (a) or a certificate of conversion filed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall have the effect of the filing of a cancellation by the converting partnership of any statement of partnership authority filed by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 107.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16907.

(a) Whenever a partnership or other business entity having any real property in this state converts into a partnership or an other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which the other business entity was organized, and the laws of the state or place of organization (including this state) of the converting partnership or other business entity provide substantially that the conversion of a converting entity vests in the converted partnership or other business entity all the real property of the converting partnership or converting other business entity, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of the converting partnership or converting other business entity is located of either (1) a certificate of conversion or a certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, or articles of incorporation, complying with Section 16906, in the form prescribed by the Secretary of State, certified by the Secretary of State, or (2) a copy of a certificate of conversion or a certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other certificate evidencing the creation of a foreign other business entity by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the conversion is effected, shall evidence record ownership in the converted partnership or converted other business entity of all interest of the converting partnership or converting other business entity in and to the real property located in that county.

(b) A filed and, if appropriate, recorded certificate of conversion, certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other certificate evidencing the creation of an other business entity by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, executed and declared to be accurate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16105, stating the name of the converting partnership or converting other business entity in whose name property was held before the conversion and the name of the converted entity, but not containing all of the other information required by Section 16906, operates with respect to the entities named to the extent provided in subdivision (a).

(c) Recording of a certificate of conversion, a certificate of limited partnership, articles of organization, articles or certificate of incorporation, or other certificate evidencing the creation of another business entity by conversion, containing a statement of conversion, in accordance with Section 16902 shall create, in favor of bona fide purchasers or encumbrancers for value, a conclusive presumption that the conversion was validly completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16908.

(a) A domestic limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or a foreign other business entity may be converted to a domestic partnership pursuant to this article, but only if the converting entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the conversion.

(b) An entity that desires to convert into a domestic partnership shall approve a plan of conversion or the instrument that is required to be approved to effect the conversion pursuant to the laws under which the entity is organized.

(c) The conversion of a domestic limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or
 foreign other business entity shall be approved by the number or percentage of the partners, members, shareholders, or holders of interest of the converting entity as is required by the law under which the entity is organized, or a greater or lesser percentage (subject to applicable laws) as set forth in the limited partnership agreement, articles of organization, operating agreement, or articles or certificate of organization, or other governing document for the converting entity.

(d) The conversion by a domestic limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, or a foreign other business entity into a partnership shall be effective under this article at the time that the conversion is effective under the laws under which the converting entity is organized.

(e) The filing with the Secretary of State of a certificate of conversion or a statement of partnership authority containing a statement of conversion pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have the effect of the filing of a certificate of cancellation by the converting foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability company, and no converting foreign limited partnership or foreign limited liability company that has made the filing is required to file a certificate of cancellation under Section 15909.07 or 17708.08 as a result of that conversion. If a converting other business entity is a foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this state, the foreign corporation shall, by virtue of the filing, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(f) Subdivision (g) of Section 16105 shall apply to a statement
 of partnership authority containing a statement of conversion filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 108.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16909.

(a) An entity that converts into another entity pursuant to this article is for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

(b) When a conversion takes effect, all of the following apply:

(1) All the rights and property, whether real, personal, or mixed, of the converting entity remains vested in the converted entity.

(2) All debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converting entity continue as debts, liabilities, and obligations of the converted entity.

(3) All rights of creditors and liens upon the property of the converting entity shall be preserved unimpaired and remain enforceable against the converted entity to the same extent as against the converting entity as if the conversion had not occurred.

(4) Any action or proceeding pending by or against the converting entity may be continued against the converted entity as if the conversion had not occurred.

(c) A partner of a converting partnership is liable for:

(1) All obligations of the converting partnership for which the partner was personally liable before the conversion.

(2) All obligations of the converted entity incurred after the conversion takes effect, but those obligations may be satisfied only out of property of the entity if (A) the converted other business entity is a limited partnership and the partner becomes a limited partner, (B) the converted other business entity is a limited liability company and the partner becomes a member, unless the articles of organization or the operating agreement of the limited liability company provide otherwise, or (C) the converted other business entity is a corporation and the partner becomes a shareholder.

(d) A partner of a partnership that converted from an other business entity is liable for any and all obligations of the converting other business entity for which the partner was personally liable before the conversion, but only to the extent the partner was liable for the obligation of the converting entity prior to the conversion.

(e) A partner of a converting partnership, who does not vote in favor of the conversion and does not agree to become a partner, member, shareholder, or holder of interest of the converted other business entity shall have the right to dissociate from the partnership, as of the date the conversion takes effect. Within 10 days after the approval of the conversion by the partners as required under this article, the converting partnership shall send notice of the approval of the conversion to each partner that has not approved the conversion, accompanied by copies of Section 16701 and a brief description of the procedure to be followed under that section if the partner wishes to dissociate from the partnership. A partner that desires to dissociate from the converting partnership shall send written notice of that dissociation within 30 days after the date of the notice of the approval of the conversion. The converting partnership shall cause the partner’s interest in the entity to be purchased under Section 16701. The converting partnership is bound under Section 16702 by an act of a general partner dissociated under this subdivision, and the partner is liable under Section 16703 for transactions entered into by the converted entity after the conversion takes effect. The dissociation of a partner in connection with a conversion pursuant to the terms of this subdivision shall not be deemed to be a wrongful dissociation under Section 16602.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16910.

(a) The following entities may be merged pursuant to this article:

(1) Two or more partnerships into one partnership.

(2) One or more partnerships and one or more other business entities into one of those other business entities.

(3) One or more partnerships, other than a limited liability partnership, and one or more other business entities into one partnership.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the merger of any number of partnerships with any number of other business entities may be effected only if the other business entities that are organized in California are authorized by the laws under which they are organized to effect the merger, and (1) if a domestic partnership is the surviving partnership, the foreign other business entities are not prohibited by the laws under which they are organized from effecting that merger and (2) if a foreign partnership or foreign other business entity is the survivor of the merger, the laws of the jurisdiction under which the survivor is organized authorize that merger.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16911.

(a) Each partnership and other business entity which desires to merge shall approve an agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved by the number or percentage of partners specified for merger in the partnership agreement of the constituent partnership. If the partnership agreement fails to specify the required partner approval for merger of the constituent partnership, then the agreement of merger shall be approved by that number or percentage of partners specified by the partnership agreement to approve an amendment to the partnership agreement. However, if the merger effects a change for which the partnership agreement requires a greater number or percentage of partners than that
 required to amend the partnership agreement, then the merger shall be approved by that greater number or percentage. If the partnership agreement contains no provision specifying the vote required to amend the partnership agreement, then the agreement of merger must be approved by all the partners. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each constituent other business entity by those persons required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized. Other persons may be parties to the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall state all of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the merger.

(2) The name and place of organization of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, and of each disappearing partnership and
 disappearing other business entity, and the agreement of merger may change the name of the surviving partnership, which new name may be the same as, or similar to, the name of a disappearing partnership.

(3) The manner of converting the partnership interests of each of the constituent partnerships into interests or other securities of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, and if partnership interests of any of the constituent partnerships are not to be converted solely into interest or other securities of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, the cash, property, rights, interests, or securities which the holders of the partnership interest are to receive in exchange for the partnership interests, which cash, property, rights, interests, or securities may be in addition to or in lieu of interests
 or other securities of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity, or that the partnership interests are canceled without consideration.

(4) Any other details or provisions as are required by the laws under which any constituent other business entity is organized.

(5) Any other details or provisions that are desired, including, without limitation, a provision for the treatment of fractional partnership interests.

(b) If the partnership is merging into a limited partnership, then in addition to the approval of the partners as set forth under subdivision (a), the agreement of merger must be approved by all partners who will become general partners of the surviving limited partnership upon the effectiveness
 of the merger.

(c) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended before the merger takes effect if the amendment is approved by the partners of each constituent partnership, in the same manner as required for approval of the original agreement of merger, and by each of the constituent other business entities.

(d) The partners of a constituent partnership may in their discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other constituent partnerships and constituent other business entities, if the abandonment is approved by the partners of the constituent partnership in the same manner as required for approval of the original agreement of merger.

(e) An agreement of merger approved in accordance with subdivision (a) may (1) effect any amendment to the partnership agreement of any domestic constituent partnership or (2) effect the adoption of a new partnership agreement for a domestic constituent partnership if it is the surviving partnership in the merger. Any amendment to a partnership agreement or adoption of a new partnership agreement made pursuant to the foregoing sentence shall be effective at the effective time or date of the merger.

(f) The surviving partnership or surviving other business entity shall keep the agreement of merger at the principal place of business of the surviving entity if the surviving entity is a partnership or a foreign other business entity, at the office referred to in Section 1500 if the surviving entity is a domestic corporation, at
 the office referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 15901.14 if the surviving entity is a domestic limited partnership or at the office referred to in Section 17701.13 if the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company and, upon the request of a partner of a constituent partnership or a holder of interests or other securities of a constituent other business entity, the authorized person on behalf of the partnership or the surviving other business entity shall promptly deliver to the partner or the holder of interests or other securities, at the expense of the surviving partnership or
 surviving other business entity, a copy of the agreement of merger. A waiver by a partner or holder of interests or other securities of the rights provided in this subdivision shall be unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 18.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

16912.

(a) Unless a future effective date or time is provided in a certificate of merger if a certificate of merger is required to be filed under Section 16915 in which event the merger shall be effective at the future effective date or time:

(1) A merger in which no domestic other business entity is a party to the merger shall be effective upon the later of any of the following:

(A) The approval of the agreement of merger by all parties to the merger as provided in Section 16911.

(B) The filing of all documents required by law to be filed as a condition to the effectiveness of the merger; or

(C) Any effective date specified in the agreement of merger; and

(2) A merger in which a domestic other business entity is a party to the merger shall be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) For all mergers in which a certificate of merger is required to be filed under Section 16915, a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of (A) the constituent partnerships (either by themselves or together with constituent other business entities) into the surviving other business entity, or (B) the constituent partnerships or the constituent other business entities, or both, into the surviving partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16913.

(a) The merger of any number of domestic partnerships with any number of foreign partnerships or foreign other business entities shall be required to comply with Section 16910.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic partnership or a domestic other business entity, the merger proceedings with respect to that partnership or other business entity and any domestic disappearing partnership shall conform to the provisions of this chapter governing the merger of domestic partnerships, but if the surviving entity is a foreign partnership or a foreign other business entity, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d), the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of organization of the surviving partnership or surviving other business entity.

(c) If the surviving entity is a domestic other business entity or is a domestic partnership in a merger in which a domestic other business entity is also a party, the certificate of merger shall be filed as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and thereupon, subject to subdivision (a) of Section 16912, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent partnership and domestic constituent other business entity.
